Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.04.520

Washington award for vocational excellence—Intent.

Every year community colleges, technical colleges, and high schools graduate students who have distinguished themselves by their outstanding performance in their occupational training programs. The legislature intends to recognize and honor these students by establishing a Washington award for vocational excellence.

[ 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 1; 1984 c 267 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1995 1st sp.s. c 7: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1995 1st sp.s. c 7 s 9.]